Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 2
CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION, AND LICENSING
OF PROCESSING FACILITIES

35-33-201. Processing facilities - operation - rules.

Each processing facility licensed under this article must be operated and maintained in a manner sufficient to prevent the creation of unsanitary conditions and to ensure that meat or meat products are not adulterated.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 513, § 10, effective April 16, 2009.)

All persons coming in contact with meat or meat products shall wear clean garments and a suitable head covering and shall keep their hands clean. No person with infected cuts or a communicable disease shall be allowed to handle meat or meat products.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 513, § 10, effective April 16, 2009.)

Unpackaged or uncovered meat or meat products shall not be moved through the slaughter, holding, or refuse rooms or areas.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 513, § 10, effective April 16, 2009.)

Adulterated or inedible meat shall be decharacterized so as to unequivocally preclude its use for human food and shall be disposed of by methods approved by the commissioner.

Decharacterization of adulterated or inedible meat shall be accomplished by freely slashing and covering all exposed surfaces with an edible green dye, charcoal, or such other methods as may be approved by the commissioner.

All meat and meat products, except poultry, resulting from the processing or slaughter of uninspected animals:

Shall, as soon as is practicable, be marked or coded with the owner's name and marked "NOT FOR SALE" in letters not less than three-eighths of an inch in height;

Shall, when packaged, be marked or coded with the owner's name, the date of wrapping of the package, and the package contents, and labeled "NOT FOR SALE"; and

Shall be returned to the owner or decharacterized and disposed of by methods approved by the commissioner, except for unclaimed meat from wildlife subject to the jurisdiction of the Colorado division of parks and wildlife, which shall be donated or disposed of in accordance with any applicable state or federal health or wildlife laws.

All poultry and poultry products must be marked as required by the commissioner by rule.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1388, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 95:

(7) amended, p. 31, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1), (2), and (4) to (10) amended, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 513, § 10, effective April 16; (1) amended, (SB 09-151), ch. 89, p. 347, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1) and IP(10) amended and (11) added, (SB 16-058), ch. 158, p. 501, § 5, effective May 4.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by Senate Bill 09-117 and Senate Bill 09-151 were harmonized.

35-33-202. Record-keeping requirements.

Every processor shall maintain records of each customer transaction, including, at a minimum:

The date of the transaction;

A description of the meat or meat products processed, including species and quantity;

The name and address of the owner; and

Such other information as may be required by rule of the commissioner.

The records maintained pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be kept for at least two years and made available to the commissioner on demand.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 515, § 11, effective April 16, 2009.)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1389, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 515, § 11, effective April 16.

L. 2016:

IP(1)(a) amended, (SB 16-058), ch. 158, p. 501, § 6, effective May 4.

35-33-203. Slaughter methods.

A processor shall not shackle, hoist, or otherwise bring animals into position for slaughter, or slaughter or bleed animals, except by humane methods.

The commissioner may promulgate rules that conform substantially to the rules of the secretary of agriculture of the United States pursuant to the federal "Humane Methods of Slaughter Act of 1958", as amended; but the use of a manually operated hammer, sledge, or poleax shall not be permitted.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1389, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 1507, § 56, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 515, § 12, effective April 16.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-058), ch. 158, p. 501, § 7, effective May 4.

Cross references:

For the federal "Humane Methods of Slaughter Act of 1958", see Pub.L. 85-765, codified at 7 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq.

35-33-203.5. Freezing prior to delivery.

Unless otherwise requested by the owner, all meat or meat products shall be sharp frozen before delivery.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 516, § 14, effective April 16.

35-33-204. Sale of adulterated or diseased meat. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1389, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 31, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1548, § 314, effective October 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 515, § 13, effective April 16.

35-33-205. Repeal of part. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 690, § 68, effective April 20.

L. 95:

Entire section repealed, p. 32, § 6, effective July 1.

35-33-206. License required - application - inspection - issuance.

Any person who desires to operate a custom processing facility shall first obtain a license from the department. A separate license shall be required for each custom processing facility. The application shall be in writing on forms supplied by the department, shall set forth such information as may be required by the department, and shall be accompanied by any required fees.

(1.5) Any person who desires to slaughter and process more than one thousand, but fewer than twenty thousand, poultry shall first obtain a license from the department. A separate license is required for each poultry processing facility. The application must be in writing on forms supplied by the department, setting forth any information required by the department, and must be accompanied by all required fees.

Upon the applicant's submission of an application for a license and payment of the required fees, the department shall inspect facilities and premises at the location to be licensed and, if it finds that the equipment, facilities, surrounding premises, and operation of such establishment comply with this article and the rules established pursuant thereto, the department shall issue a license to operate unless the department finds that there are grounds for denial or refusal to renew a license pursuant to section 35-33-208.

The license shall be valid for the period from the date of issuance until the expiration date established by the commissioner by rule and, except for good cause shown, shall be renewed annually thereafter.

A license shall not be transferable to a new owner or location.

Any person who operates a custom processing facility without a valid license therefor commits a petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 516, § 14, effective April 16.

L. 2016:

(1.5) added, (SB 16-058), ch. 158, p. 501, § 8, effective May 4.

L. 2021:

(5) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3279, § 630, effective March 1, 2022.

35-33-207. License fees.

The fee for each license under this article shall be established by the commission. There shall be no reduction of a license fee for any fractional part of a year. The fee schedule shall cover all direct and indirect costs associated with the licensing, inspection, and regulation of custom processors.

Any person who fails to renew a license on or before the expiration date of the license shall pay a late fee, as established by the commission, in addition to the license fee.

All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 516, § 14, effective April 16.

35-33-208. Disciplinary actions - grounds.

In accordance with the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., the commissioner may deny, suspend, revoke, restrict, refuse to renew, or place on probation the license of any applicant or licensee who:

Makes a false statement or misrepresentation on an application for a license or renewal;

Has had a previous license or any equivalent authorization to engage in activities regulated under this article revoked, suspended, or denied by any authority authorized to grant such license or authorization in this or any other state;

Has failed to comply with or violated any provision of this article or any rule promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this article; or

Fails to obey any lawful order of the commissioner.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-117), ch. 123, p. 517, § 14, effective April 16.